Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.530.030

Disposition of bond proceeds—Capital projects fund.

When the bonds have been sold, the county treasurer shall place the money derived from such sale to the credit of the capital projects fund of the district, and such fund is hereby created.

[ 1984 c 186 s 12; 1983 c 167 s 24; 1979 ex.s. c 257 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.070. Prior: 1911 c 88 s 1; 1909 c 97 p 326 s 4; RRS s 4944; prior: 1907 c 240 s 9; 1905 c 142 s 7; 1897 c 118 s 120; 1890 p 47 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.51.070, 28.51.070, 28.51.080, 28.51.090, 28.51.100, and 28.51.110.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 257: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 257 s 3.]